Tennessee statutes. Title 12 Public Property, Printing And Contracts
Chapter 10

Public Building Authorities Act of 1971

12-10-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Public Building Authorities Act of 1971.”

Acts 1971, ch. 126, § 1; T.C.A., § 12-901.

12-10-102. Purposes — Liberal construction.

It is hereby found and declared that there exist in many municipalities within this state inadequate and outmoded public buildings, structures, and facilities for the furnishing of governmental, educational and other public services and for use in the conduct of government by the various branches, departments and agencies thereof; that in many cases, by reason of the age and physical condition of such public buildings, structures and facilities and the increased activities on the part of both the citizens and government, such facilities are no longer adapted or adequate to meet the needs of the growing population; that, as a consequence thereof, there are many counties, cities and towns, and other branches and agencies of state and local government within the state which are compelled to spend large sums of money annually in the rental, operation and maintenance of additional building space to house the various branches, departments and agencies of government to meet this ever increasing need; that, as a result thereof, in many of the counties, cities and towns within this state, the public buildings housing the various branches, departments and agencies of government are widely scattered and dispersed throughout the locality, thereby resulting in reduced efficiency of operation in the necessary intergovernmental activities of the various branches and agencies of government; that many public records, wills, conveyances, vital statistics, court decrees, and other similar documents in use in the conduct of daily business, are now filed in poorly protected and overcrowded spaces and at widely separated locations by reason of the lack of an adequate public building or buildings; that the rendering of governmental, health, safety, educational, and welfare services is adversely affected by reason thereof, to the detriment of the citizens in such counties, cities and towns; that the shortage of adequate buildings, structures and facilities impairs the efficient and economical governmental functions of the various branches and agencies of government and the rendering of governmental, educational, health, safety, and welfare services; that in many instances it is not feasible for the various branches and agencies of government to make capital expenditures for the purpose of constructing or acquiring public buildings, structures or facilities and there are not otherwise available buildings, structures or facilities for rent for public purposes; that in many instances effective cooperation between various units of government in providing adequate facilities for the rendering of public services has been hampered because of inadequate statutory authority therefor; and in order to eradicate these conditions, it is hereby found and declared to be necessary and desirable to make possible the construction, acquisition, or enlargement of public buildings, structures, and facilities, hereafter in this chapter referred to as “projects,” to be made available for use by municipal corporations and other public lessees at convenient locations within the counties, cities and towns, in the efficient and economical furnishing of governmental, educational, health, safety, and welfare services to the citizens of such counties, cities and towns; and the eradication of the aforementioned conditions by the passage of this chapter to authorize the incorporation in the several counties, cities and towns of public corporations to finance, acquire, erect, own, operate, maintain, lease, and/or dispose of public buildings, structures, and facilities for the use of the several municipal corporations and other public lessees is hereby declared to be a public use essential to the public interest.

It is further found and declared that, in this state and in many municipalities within this state, there exist serious deficiencies in and a need for additional public buildings, structures, facilities, roads, streets, sidewalks and alleys and that such public buildings, structures, facilities, roads, streets, sidewalks and alleys are in need of enlargement and repair, to the end that the quality of life and the health, safety and welfare of the citizens of this state and the municipalities therein will be enhanced and protected and that the transportation of goods and persons and the flow of commerce will thereby be facilitated, and that it is necessary and desirable to make possible the construction, acquisition, enlargement, repair and renovation of such public buildings, structures, facilities, roads, streets, sidewalks and alleys, hereafter also in this chapter referred to as “projects,” to be made available for use by the state of Tennessee or any agency, authority, branch, bureau, commission, corporation, department or instrumentality thereof, and municipal corporations and other public bodies, and any such undertaking is hereby declared to be a public use essential to the public interest.

This chapter shall be liberally construed in conformity with such intention.

Acts 1971, ch. 126, § 2; T.C.A., § 12-902; Acts 1980, ch. 653, §§ 1-3; 1982, ch. 902, §§ 1-3; 1984, ch. 823, § 1.

Attorney General Opinions. County school board's authority to contract with public building authority, OAG 99-094, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 94 (4/21/99).

12-10-103. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Authority” or “public building authority” means any public corporation organized pursuant to this chapter;

“Bonds” or “revenue bonds” means bonds, notes, interim certificates or other obligations of an authority issued pursuant to this chapter, or pursuant to any other law, as supplemented by, or in conjunction with, this chapter;

“Contracting party” or “other contracting party” means any party to a sale contract or loan agreement except the authority;

“Governing body” means the body in which the general legislative powers of a municipal corporation are vested, and in the case of counties means the legislative body of the respective counties;

“Lessee” means any municipal corporation, the state of Tennessee, the United States, or any agency, authority, branch, bureau, commission, corporation, department or instrumentality thereof now or hereafter existing;

“Loan agreement” means an agreement providing for an authority to loan the proceeds derived from the issuance of bonds pursuant to this chapter to one (1) or more contracting parties to be used to pay the cost of one (1) or more projects and providing for the repayment of such loan by the other contracting party or parties, and which may provide for such loans to be secured by or evidenced by one (1) or more notes, debentures, bonds or other secured or unsecured debt obligations of the contracting party or parties, delivered to the authority or to the trustee under the indenture pursuant to which the bonds were issued;

“Municipal corporation” means any county, metropolitan government, incorporated city or town, utility district, school district, power district, sanitary district or other municipal, quasi-municipal or governmental body or political subdivision in this state, and any agency, authority, branch, bureau, commission, corporation, department or instrumentality thereof now or hereafter authorized by law to be created;

“Municipality” means any county, incorporated city or town or utility district in this state with respect to which an authority may be organized;

“Operating contract” means the written undertaking whereby the authority and a municipal corporation contract respecting construction of improvements upon and/or for the operation and maintenance of property owned by or leased by other than the authority to the municipal corporation;

“Project” means any undertaking which is eligible to be financed by bonds, notes, interim certificates or other obligations issued pursuant to law by any municipal corporation, the state of Tennessee or any agency, authority, branch, bureau, commission, corporation, department or instrumentality thereof, but if and only to the extent that they or any one (1) or more of them are participating as a contracting party or party to a lease under this chapter or any other provision of law; provided, that any project undertaken on behalf of the state of Tennessee or any agency, authority, branch, bureau, commission, corporation, department or instrumentality thereof, shall be subject to the approval of the state building commission, and the financing arrangements for such project shall be subject to the approval of the state funding board. “Project” includes an undertaking whereby a municipal corporation contracts with an authority respecting construction of improvements upon and/or for the operation and maintenance of property owned by or leased by other than the authority to the municipal corporation; provided, that the authority may not borrow money or issue bonds with respect thereto unless the authority has a freehold or leasehold interest in the real estate;

“Revenues” of a project, or derived from a project, includes payments under a lease or sale contract and repayments under a loan agreement, or under notes, debentures, bonds and other secured or unsecured debt obligations of a lease or contracting party delivered as herein provided;

“Sale contract” means a contract providing for the sale of one (1) or more projects to one (1) or more contracting parties and includes a contract providing for payment of the purchase price in one (1) or more installments. If the sale contract permits title to the project to pass to the other contracting party or parties prior to payment in full of the entire purchase price, it shall also provide for the other contracting party or parties to deliver to the authority or to the trustee under the indenture pursuant to which the bonds were issued one (1) or more notes, debentures, bonds or other secured or unsecured debt obligations of such contracting party or parties providing for timely payments, including, without limitation, interest thereon for the balance of the purchase price at or prior to the passage of such title; and

“State of Tennessee” means the state of Tennessee and, unless otherwise indicated by the context, any agency, authority, branch, bureau, commission, corporation, department or instrumentality thereof now or hereafter existing.

Acts 1971, ch. 126, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A., § 12-903; Acts 1980, ch. 653, §§ 4, 5; 1982, ch. 902, §§ 4, 5; 1984, ch. 823, §§ 2-4; 1995, ch. 74, §§ 1, 2; 2008, ch. 720, § 1.

Attorney General Opinions. County school board a “municipal corporation,” OAG 99-094, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 94 (4/21/99).

12-10-104. Application to governing body for approval of incorporation.

Whenever any number of natural persons, not less than three (3), each of whom shall be a duly qualified elector of the county or of the incorporated city or town or each of whom shall be a current customer of the utility district, shall file with the governing body thereof an application in writing seeking permission to apply for the incorporation of a public building authority of the municipality, the governing body shall proceed to consider the application. If the governing body shall, by appropriate resolution duly adopted, find and determine that it is wise, expedient, necessary or advisable that the authority be formed, and shall authorize the persons making such application to proceed to form such authority and shall approve the form of certificates of incorporation proposed to be used in organizing the authority, then the persons making such application shall execute, acknowledge and file a certificate of incorporation for the authority as hereinafter provided. No authority may be formed unless such application shall have first been filed with the governing body of the municipality and the governing body shall have adopted a resolution as provided in this section.

Acts 1971, ch. 126, § 4; T.C.A., § 12-904; Acts 2008, ch. 720, § 2.

12-10-105. Certificate of incorporation — Contents.

The certificate of incorporation shall set forth:

The names and residences of the applicants together with a recital that each of them is an elector of the county or of the incorporated city or town or is a customer of the utility district.

The name of the authority which shall be public building authority of the of (the blanks to be filled in with the name of the municipality);

A recital that permission to organize the authority has been granted by resolution duly adopted by the governing body of the municipality and the date of the adoption of such resolution;

The location of the principal office of the authority;

The purposes for which the authority is proposed to be organized;

The number of directors of the authority;

The period, which may be perpetual, for the duration of the authority; and

Any other matter which the applicants may choose to insert therein which shall not be inconsistent with this chapter or with the laws of this state.

The certificate of incorporation shall be subscribed and acknowledged by each of the applicants before an officer authorized by the laws of Tennessee to take acknowledgments to deeds.

Acts 1971, ch. 126, § 5; T.C.A., § 12-905; Acts 2008, ch. 720, § 3.

12-10-106. Filing and approval of certificate of incorporation.

When executed and acknowledged in conformity with § 12-10-105, the certificate of incorporation shall be filed with the secretary of state.

The secretary of state shall thereupon examine the certificate of incorporation and, if the secretary of state finds that the recitals contained therein are correct, that the requirements of § 12-10-104 have been complied with, and that the name is not identical with or so nearly similar to that of another public building authority already in existence in this state as to lead to confusion and uncertainty, the secretary of state shall approve the certificate of incorporation and record it in an appropriate book or record in the secretary of state's office.

When such certificate has been so made, filed and approved, the authority shall constitute a public corporation under the name set out in the certificate of incorporation.

Acts 1971, ch. 126, § 6; T.C.A., § 12-906.

12-10-107. Amendment of certificate of incorporation.

The certificate of incorporation may at any time and from time to time be amended so as to make any changes therein and add any provisions thereto which might have been included in the certificate of incorporation in the first instance. Any such amendment shall be effected in the following manner: the members of the board of directors of the authority shall file with the governing body of the municipality with which the application for the creation of the authority was filed, an application in writing seeking permission to amend the certificate of incorporation, specifying in such application the amendment proposed to be made. Such governing body shall consider such application and, if it by appropriate resolution duly finds and determines that it is wise, expedient, necessary or advisable that the proposed amendment be made, and authorizes the same to be made, and approves the form of the proposed amendment, then the persons making such application shall execute an instrument embodying the amendment specified in such application, and shall file the same with the secretary of state. The proposed amendment shall be subscribed and acknowledged by each member of the board of directors before an officer authorized by the laws of Tennessee to take acknowledgments to deeds. The secretary of state shall thereupon examine the proposed amendment and, if the secretary of state finds compliance with the requirements of this section, and the proposed amendment is within the scope of what might be included in an original certificate of incorporation, the secretary of state shall approve the amendment and record it in an appropriate book in the secretary of state's office. When such amendment has been so made, filed and approved, it shall thereupon become effective and the certificate of incorporation shall thereupon be amended to the extent provided in the amendment. No certificate of incorporation shall be amended except in the manner provided in this section.

Acts 1971, ch. 126, § 7; T.C.A., § 12-907.

12-10-108. Board of directors — Executive committee — Administrator — Consent action.

The authority shall have a board of directors in which all corporate powers of the authority shall be vested and which shall consist of any number of directors, no less than seven (7), all of whom shall be duly qualified electors of the municipality. The directors shall serve as such without compensation, except that they shall be reimbursed for their actual expenses incurred in and about the performance of their duties hereunder. No director shall be an officer or employee of the municipality. The directors shall be appointed by the chief executive officer, subject to confirmation of the governing body of the municipality, and they shall be so appointed that they shall hold office for staggered terms. In the case of authorities created pursuant to the approval of two (2) or more municipalities acting jointly, as hereinafter provided, the number of directors appointed by the chief executive officer of each municipality shall be as nearly equal as practicable. At the time of the appointment of the first board of directors, the chief executive officer of the municipality shall divide the directors into three (3) groups containing as near equal whole numbers as may be possible. The first term of the directors included in the first group shall be two (2) years, the first term of the directors included in the second group shall be four (4) years, the first term of the directors included in the third group shall be six (6) years, and thereafter the terms of all directors shall be six (6) years; provided, that if at the expiration of any term of office of any director a successor thereto shall not have been appointed, then the director whose term of office shall have expired shall continue to hold office until such director's successor shall be so appointed.

Notwithstanding any provision of subdivision (a)(1) or any other law to the contrary, if a public building authority engages in or contracts for the modification, construction, operation, maintenance, or management of an arena facility for a National Basketball Association member professional basketball team, then the board of directors appointed and confirmed pursuant to subdivision (a)(1) must include two (2) additional directors whose qualifications, appointment and service shall be governed by this subdivision (a)(2). Following consultation with the speaker of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives, the chief executive officer of the municipality shall appoint, subject to confirmation of the governing body of the municipality:

One (1) state senator whose legislative district lies, in whole or in part, within the boundaries of the municipality; and

One (1) state representative whose legislative district lies, in whole or in part, within the boundaries of the municipality.

The term of office for each director appointed pursuant to this subdivision (a)(2) shall not extend beyond the director's current term of office in the state senate or house of representatives. Each director appointed pursuant to this subdivision (a)(2) shall serve as such without compensation, except that such director shall be reimbursed for such director's actual expenses incurred in and about the performance of such director's duties hereunder. Notwithstanding the fact that two (2) or more municipalities may have approved incorporation of the public building authority pursuant to § 12-10-104, this subdivision (a)(2) shall not be construed to require appointment of more than one state senator and one state representative to serve as directors; and, under such circumstances, the chief executive officers of the municipalities shall jointly make such appointments, subject to confirmation of the governing bodies of the municipalities.

Notwithstanding subdivision (a)(1) or any other law to the contrary, the directors of an authority created by a utility district shall be customers of the utility district and members of the board of commissioners and employees of the utility district may serve as a director.

Notwithstanding subdivision (a)(1) or any other law to the contrary, the directors of an authority created jointly by two (2) or more utility districts pursuant to § 12-10-120 must either be a customer of one of the creating utility districts or a member of the board of directors of the Tennessee association of utility districts. The directors shall be appointed by the board of commissioners of each creating utility district with the number of directors appointed by each board of commissioners to be as nearly equal as practicable. The directors shall be appointed so that they have staggered terms. At the time of the appointment of the first board of directors, the boards of commissioners of the creating utility districts shall divide the directors into three (3) groups containing as near equal whole numbers as may be possible. The first term of the directors included in the first group shall be two (2) years, the first term of the directors included in the second group shall be four (4) years, the first term of the directors included in the third group shall be six (6) years, thereafter the terms of all directors shall be six (6) years; provided, that, if at the expiration of any term of office of any director a successor to the director has not been appointed, then the director whose term of office has expired shall continue to hold office until the director's successor has been so appointed. The term of office of each director who is a member of the board of directors of the Tennessee association of utility districts shall not extend beyond the director's term as a director of the Tennessee association of utility districts.

The directors shall meet and organize as a board and shall elect one (1) of its members as chair, one (1) as vice chair, one (1) as treasurer and one (1) as secretary, and such officers shall annually be elected thereafter in like manner. The duties of secretary and treasurer may be performed by the same director. In the absence of any of the chair, vice chair, secretary or treasurer, another member may be elected to fill the vacancy for the anticipated term thereof. Any action taken by the directors under this chapter may be authorized by resolution at any regular or special meeting, and such resolution shall take effect immediately and need not be published or posted. A majority of the board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. The concurring vote of a majority of all the directors shall be necessary for the exercise of any of the powers granted by this chapter.

The board of directors may establish an executive committee to be composed of officers designated in subsection (b) and at least one (1) other director. Except as may be limited by the board of directors, the executive committee shall have responsibility for the general superintendence of the administrative affairs of the authority. It shall have the power to employ, discharge, and, within budgeted or otherwise available funds, to compensate regular and part-time employees of the authority; to authorize contracts for the operation and maintenance of projects, which contracts shall be for a period not exceeding one (1) year in duration and for which funds have been budgeted or otherwise provided by the board of directors; to manage and operate parking facilities; within available funds, to provide operating and maintenance services respecting a project; and to administer contracts and undertakings of the authority. The executive committee shall keep minutes and supply a copy of the same to each director. Action shall be by an affirmative vote of a majority of the executive committee. All actions of the executive committee may be reviewed by the board of directors except as to rights of contractees which have accrued.

The board of directors may establish the position of administrator. The administrator may be employed by the board of directors to perform the administrative duties of the authority within the authority granted by the board of directors and/or the executive committee. Except as otherwise directed, the administrator may establish responsibilities of employees of the authority and supervise their performance, including the power, within budgeted or otherwise available funds, to hire and to discharge regular and part-time employees; and, subject to direction of the secretary and treasurer, have responsibility for the records and accounts of the authority.

If authorized by the charter and bylaws, the board of directors and the committee thereof may take action by written consent. The bylaws shall require copies of such consent actions to be provided forthwith to each director.

Acts 1971, ch. 126, § 8; T.C.A., § 12-908; Acts 1996, ch. 762, § 1; 1997, ch. 405, § 6; 2001, ch. 364, § 1; 2008, ch. 720, § 4.

Attorney General Opinions. The amendment of T.C.A. §12-10-108 by the addition of subdivision (a)(2) did not create a new board, commission, or authority, OAG 01-123, 2001 Tenn. AG LEXIS 114 (8/7/01).

12-10-109. Powers of authorities.

Each public building authority created pursuant to this chapter shall be a public nonprofit corporation and a public instrumentality of the municipality with respect to which the authority is organized. The authority has the following powers, together with all powers incidental thereto or necessary for the performance of those hereinafter stated, to:

Have succession by its corporate name for the period specified in the certificate of incorporation unless sooner dissolved as hereinafter provided;

Sue and be sued and prosecute and defend, at law or in equity, in any court having jurisdiction of the subject matter and of the parties;

Have and use a corporate seal and alter the same at pleasure;

Acquire, whether by purchase, construction, exchange, gift, lease or otherwise, and improve, repair, extend, equip, furnish, operate and maintain one (1) or more projects, which projects may be within or without the municipality or municipalities with respect to which the authority shall have been created, including all real and personal properties which the board of directors of the authority may deem necessary in connection therewith, and regardless of whether or not any such projects shall then be in existence, and including the power to demolish such existing structures as may be on sites acquired when such structures are not needed for the project;

Pave and improve streets within the area of a project and construct, repair and install sidewalks, sewers, gutters, water mains and other similar improvements and facilities in the area, and provide offstreet parking facilities in connection with any project;

Operate, maintain, manage, and enter into contracts for the operation, maintenance and management of any project undertaken, and make rules and regulations with regard to such operation, maintenance and management;

Employ, contract with, fix the compensation of, and discharge engineering, architectural, legal and financial experts and such other employees, both professional and other, as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter and provide for the proper operation and maintenance of any project;

Lease all or any part or parts of any project to any lessee and execute written leases therefor, for any period of time not to exceed forty (40) years, and charge and collect rent therefor and terminate any such lease upon the failure of the lessee to comply with any of the obligations thereof; and include in or exclude from any such lease, provisions that the lessee shall have the option to renew the term of the lease for such period or periods and at such rent as shall be determined by the board of directors, that such lessee may purchase the project being leased or that upon payment of the indebtedness of the authority incurred with respect to such project, it may lease or convey any or all of its projects to the lessee or lessees thereof with or without consideration;

Lease such space in a project as from time to time may not be needed by any lessee to any other person, corporation, partnership or association for such purposes as the board of directors may determine will best serve the comfort and convenience of the occupants of such project and upon such terms and in such manner as the board may determine;

Sell, exchange, donate and convey any or all of its properties whenever the board of directors shall find any such action to be in furtherance of the purposes for which the authority was organized, and enter into sales contracts with others in connection with the sale of any such properties;

Procure and enter into contracts for any type of insurance or indemnity against loss or damage to property from any cause, including loss of use and occupancy, against death or injury of any person, against employer's liability, against any act of any member, officer or employee of the authority in the performance of the duties of such person's office or employment or any other insurable risk, as the board of directors in its discretion may deem necessary;

Accept donations, contributions, capital grants or gifts from any individuals, associations, municipal or private corporations, the state of Tennessee and the United States, or any agency or instrumentality thereof, for or in aid of any of the purposes of this chapter and enter into agreements in connection therewith;

Borrow money from time to time and in evidence of the obligation thereby incurred to issue and sell its revenue bonds in such amount or amounts as the board of directors may determine to provide funds for the purpose of financing, acquiring, erecting, extending, improving, equipping or repairing any project or for any combination of such purposes, and demolishing structures on the project site and acquiring a site or sites necessary and convenient for such project, including, but without in any way limiting the generality of the foregoing, architectural, engineering, legal, financing and bond insurance expenses, and including an amount sufficient to meet the interest charges on such revenue bonds during construction of any project and for two (2) years after the estimated date of completion; and refund and refinance, from time to time, revenue bonds so issued and sold, as often as may be deemed to be advantageous by the board of directors; and pending the issuance of its revenue bonds for the purposes in this chapter authorized, issue its interim certificates or notes or other temporary obligations;

Enter into any agreement or contract with any lessee, who, pursuant to the terms of this chapter, is renting or is about to rent from the authority all or part of any building or buildings or facilities, whereby under such agreement or contract the lessee obligates itself to pay all or part of the cost of maintaining and operating the premises so leased. Such agreement may be included as a provision of any lease entered into pursuant to the terms of this chapter or may be made the subject of a separate agreement or contract between the authority and such lessee;

As security for the payment of the principal of and interest on any bonds so issued and any agreements made in connection therewith, mortgage and pledge any or all of its projects or any part or parts thereof, whether then owned or thereafter acquired, and pledge the revenues and receipts therefrom or from any thereof, and/or assign and pledge all or any part of its interest in and rights under the leases, sales contracts or loan agreements relating thereto or any thereof;

Exercise all powers expressly given in its certificate of incorporation and establish bylaws and make all rules and regulations not inconsistent with the certificate of incorporation or this chapter deemed expedient for the management of the affairs of the authority;

Enter into loan agreements with others with respect to one (1) or more projects for such payments and upon such terms as the board of directors of the authority may deem advisable in accordance with this chapter, including, but not limited to, the following:

The board of directors of the authority may, by appropriate action, request the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee to review loan agreements entered into between the authority and a municipal corporation; and

If the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee determines that it is advisable to review the loan agreements pursuant to a request by the authority, then prior to entering into a loan agreement with the authority, the municipal corporation must obtain the approval of the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee;

Sell, lease, transfer or convey any air rights and appropriate easements, including easements for support, ingress and egress, in, above, under or adjacent to property acquired for the construction, maintenance and operation of a project. Sale, lease, transfer or conveyance may be accomplished either by public bid or by private sale in such manner, upon such terms and for such consideration as may be determined by the board of directors to be most advantageous to the authority;

Enter into contracts with a municipal corporation respecting construction of improvements upon and/or operation and maintenance of any property owned by or leased by other than the authority to the municipal corporation. Such contracts shall specify the extent and nature of the services to be rendered by the authority; and

Have control of its parking facilities with the right and duty to establish and charge fees, rentals, rates and other charges, and collect revenues therefrom, not inconsistent with the rights of the holders of its bonds.

Except as otherwise approved by the comptroller of the treasury, any authority created pursuant to this chapter shall have the power and shall cause to be made an annual audit of the accounts and records of the authority. The audit shall include all funds of the authority whether held by the authority or pursuant to trust indentures. The comptroller of the treasury, through the department of audit, shall be responsible for ensuring that the audits are prepared in accordance with generally accepted governmental auditing standards and determining if the audits meet minimum audit standards which shall be prescribed by the comptroller of the treasury. No audit may be accepted as meeting the requirements of this subsection (b) until such audit has been approved by the comptroller of the treasury. The audits may be prepared by certified public accountants, public accountants or by the department of audit. In the event the authority shall fail or refuse to have the audit prepared, then the comptroller of the treasury may appoint a certified public accountant or public accountant or direct the department of audit to prepare the audit, the cost of such audit to be paid by the authority. All such audits shall be completed as soon as practicable after the end of the authority's fiscal year. One (1) copy of the audit shall be furnished to each member of the board of directors, the chief executive officer of the municipality with respect to which the authority has organized, and the comptroller of the treasury. Copies of each audit shall also be made available to the press.

Any municipal corporation that has submitted a loan agreement to be entered into between the municipal corporation and the authority to the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee for approval pursuant to this section shall submit an annual budget in a form consistent with accepted governmental standards to the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee immediately upon its adoption, and each year thereafter, so long as the loan agreement is outstanding.

An authority created by a utility district or jointly created by two (2) or more utility districts under § 12-10-120 shall only have the powers set forth in this section and in this chapter for projects that consist of utility infrastructure, improvements, facilities and buildings that are an integral part of a public utility's operations and that are used by a public utility in providing utility services to its customers.

The powers granted by this chapter may be exercised without regard to requirements, restrictions or procedural provisions contained in § 55-21-105(a) or any other law or charter, except as expressly provided in this chapter.

Acts 1971, ch. 126, § 9; 1977, ch. 92, § 1; T.C.A., § 12-909; Acts 1980, ch. 653, §§ 6-8; 1982, ch. 902, §§ 6-8; 1984, ch. 823, §§ 5, 9; 1987, ch. 182, §§ 1, 2; 1989, ch. 337, § 1; 1995, ch. 74, § 3; 2008, ch. 720, § 5; 2010, ch. 868, §§ 73-75; 2014, ch. 634, §§ 1, 3.

Attorney General Opinions. Power of authority to enter into interest rate cap agreement in connection with issuance of variable rate revenue bonds, OAG 95-054, 1995 Tenn. AG LEXIS 55 (5/19/95).

12-10-110. Acceptance of donations.

For the purpose of aiding and cooperating with an authority, the municipality, with respect to which such authority is created, may assign or loan any of its employees, including its engineering staff and facilities, and may provide necessary office space, equipment, or other facilities for the use of such authority.

The governing body of such municipality and the governing body of any municipal corporation entering into a lease of any project or part or parts thereof may make donations of property, real or personal, or cash grants to the authority in such amount or amounts as it may deem proper and appropriate in aiding the authority to effectuate the purpose for its creation.

Any municipality with respect to which an authority is created and any municipal corporation entering into a lease with an authority, which owns a fee simple title to real property located within the area of any project, may convey such real property, or any part thereof, to the authority and may include a provision in such conveyance for the reverter of such real property to the transferor at such time as all revenue bonds or other obligations of the authority incident to the real property so conveyed shall have been paid in full, and any authority created pursuant to this chapter is hereby authorized to accept such a conveyance.

Acts 1971, ch. 126, § 10; T.C.A., § 12-910.